test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONG_NoExtra_aamoo_gt-norm.yaml
     aamoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: aamooenhishiwaaing
     aamoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: aamooenhishinian
     aamoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: aamooenhishiniag
     aamoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: aamooenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: aamooensishibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: aamooensishibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: aamooensishibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aamooensish***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aamooensish***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aamooensish***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: aamooenhishibanan
     aamoo+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: aamooenhishibanag
     aamoo+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: aamooenhishibaning
     aamoo+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aamooenhish***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aamooenhish***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aamooenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aamooensinaanibanan
     aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aamooensinaanibanag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aamooensinaanibaning
     aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aamooensinaan***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aamooensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aamooensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aamooensiwaaibanan
     aamoo+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aamooensiwaaibanag
     aamoo+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aamooensiwaaibaning
     aamoo+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aamooensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aamooensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aamooensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aamooensiniibanan
     aamoo+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aamooensiniibanag
     aamoo+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aamooensiniibaning
     aamoo+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aamooensini***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aamooensini***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aamooensini***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aamooenhinaanibanan
     aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aamooenhinaanibanag
     aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aamooenhinaanibaning
     aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aamooenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aamooenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aamooenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aamooenhiwaaibanan
     aamoo+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aamooenhiwaaibanag
     aamoo+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aamooenhiwaaibaning
     aamoo+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aamooenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aamooenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aamooenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aamooenhiniibanan
     aamoo+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aamooenhiniibanag
     aamoo+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aamooenhiniibaning
     aamoo+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aamooenhini***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aamooenhini***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aamooenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: aamooimishinaaniban
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: aamooimishinaan***idig, idog***
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: aamooimishiwaaiban
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: aamooimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: aamooimishiniiban
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: aamooimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: aamooimishinaanan
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: aamooimishinaanag
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: aamooimishinaaning
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: aamooimishiwaaan
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: aamooimishiwaaag
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: aamooimishiwaaing
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: aamooimishinian
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: aamooimishiniag
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: aamooimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: aamooimishibanan
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: aamooimishibanag
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: aamooimishibaning
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: aamooimish***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: aamooimish***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: aamooimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aamooiminaanibanan
     aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aamooiminaanibanag
     aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aamooiminaanibaning
     aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aamooiminaan***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aamooiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aamooiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aamooimiwaaibanan
     aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aamooimiwaaibanag
     aamoo+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aamooimiwaaibaning
     aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aamooimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aamooimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aamooimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aamooiminiibanan
     aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aamooiminiibanag
     aamoo+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aamooiminiibaning
     aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aamooimini***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aamooimini***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aamooimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: aamooishinaanibanan
     aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: aamooishinaanibanag
     aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: aamooishinaanibaning
     aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: aamooishinaan***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: aamooishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: aamooishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: aamooishiwaaibanan
     aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: aamooishiwaaibanag
     aamoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: aamooishiwaaibaning
     aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: aamooishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: aamooishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: aamooishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: aamooishiniibanan
     aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: aamooishiniibanag
     aamoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: aamooishiniibaning
     aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: aamooishini***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: aamooishini***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: aamooishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niaamooensimishinaan
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niaamooensimishiwaa
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niaamooensimishini
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niaamooenhimishinaan
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niaamooenhimishiwaa
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niaamooenhimishini
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giaamooensimishinaan
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giaamooensimishiwaa
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giaamooensimishini
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giaamooenhimishinaan
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giaamooenhimishiwaa
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giaamooenhimishini
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: oaamooensimishinaan
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: oaamooensimishiwaa
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: oaamooensimishini
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: oaamooenhimishinaan
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: oaamooenhimishiwaa
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: oaamooenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: niaamooensimishiban
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: niaamooensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: niaamooenhimishiban
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: niaamooenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: giaamooensimishiban
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: giaamooensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: giaamooenhimishiban
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: giaamooenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: oaamooensimishiban
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: oaamooensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: oaamooenhimishiban
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: oaamooenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: niaamooensimishan
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: niaamooensimishag
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: niaamooensimishing
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: niaamooenhimishan
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: niaamooenhimishag
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: niaamooenhimishing
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: giaamooensimishan
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: giaamooensimishag
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: giaamooensimishing
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: giaamooenhimishan
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: giaamooenhimishag
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: giaamooenhimishing
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: oaamooensimishan
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: oaamooensimishag
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: oaamooensimishing
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: oaamooenhimishan
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: oaamooenhimishag
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: oaamooenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: niaamooensiminaaniban
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niaamooensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: niaamooensimiwaaiban
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: niaamooensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: niaamooensiminiiban
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: niaamooensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: niaamooenhiminaaniban
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niaamooenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: niaamooenhimiwaaiban
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: niaamooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: niaamooenhiminiiban
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: niaamooenhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: giaamooensiminaaniban
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giaamooensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: giaamooensimiwaaiban
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: giaamooensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: giaamooensiminiiban
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: giaamooensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: giaamooenhiminaaniban
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giaamooenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: giaamooenhimiwaaiban
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: giaamooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: giaamooenhiminiiban
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: giaamooenhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: oaamooensiminaaniban
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oaamooensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: oaamooensimiwaaiban
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: oaamooensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: oaamooensiminiiban
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: oaamooensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: oaamooenhiminaaniban
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oaamooenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: oaamooenhimiwaaiban
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: oaamooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: oaamooenhiminiiban
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: oaamooenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: niaamooensiminaanan
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: niaamooensiminaanag
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: niaamooensiminaaning
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: niaamooensimiwaaan
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: niaamooensimiwaaag
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: niaamooensimiwaaing
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: niaamooensiminian
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: niaamooensiminiag
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: niaamooensiminiing
